Utah statutes.
26-8a-303.   Designation of emergency medical service providers.

(1)  To ensure quality emergency medical services, the committee shall establish designation requirements for emergency medical service providers in the following categories:

(a)  quick response provider;

(b)  resource hospital for emergency medical providers;

(c)  emergency medical service dispatch center;

(d) emergency patient receiving facilities; and

(e)  other types of emergency medical service providers as the committee considers necessary.

(2)  The department shall, based on the requirements in Subsection (1), issue designations to emergency medical service providers listed in Subsection (1).

(3)  As provided in Section 26-8a-502, an entity issued a designation under Subsection (1) may only function and hold itself out in accordance with its designation.

